Washington statutes.
RCW 11.08.180

Department of revenue to be furnished copies of documents and pleadings.

The department of revenue may demand copies of any papers, documents, or pleadings involving the escheat property or the probate thereof deemed by it to be necessary for the enforcement of RCW 11.08.140 through 11.08.280 and it shall be the duty of the administrator or his or her attorney to furnish such copies to the department.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2007; 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 3; 1965 c 145 s 11.08.180. Prior: 1955 c 254 s 6.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 278: See notes following RCW 11.08.160.